California statutes. Education Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89911.

Any construction project located on property of the California State University that is performed pursuant to a contract entered into or awarded by an auxiliary organization and funded in whole or in part by public funds is subject to the California State University Contract Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10700) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

89912.

All bonds, notes, borrowings, or other evidences of indebtedness of an auxiliary organization and interest thereon or income therefrom are exempt from all taxation in the state other than estate and generation skipping transfer taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 779, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. The Richard McKee Transparency Act of 2011 [89913. - 89919.]

89913.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Access to information concerning the conduct of the people’s business is a necessary and fundamental right of every person in this state.

(b) California State University auxiliary organizations promote and assist the Trustees of the California State University by engaging in activities that are essential and integral to the mission and purpose of the California State University.

(c) California State University auxiliary organizations are independently governed corporations that are legally separate from the California State
 University.

(d) Access to records used, owned, or maintained by auxiliary organizations must be balanced by the need to protect the individual privacy rights of donors and volunteers, and to protect an auxiliary organization’s fiduciary interests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89913.5.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Auxiliary organization” means those entities defined in Section 89901.

(b) “Identifiable writing” means any handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, photocopying, transmitting by electronic mail or facsimile, and every other means of recording upon any tangible thing, any form of communication or representation, including, but not limited to, letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combinations thereof, and any record thereby created, regardless of the manner in which the record has been stored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89914.

(a) Records maintained by an auxiliary organization shall be available to the public to inspect or copy at all times during the office hours of the auxiliary organization, except as hereafter provided. The records subject to inspection or copying by the public pursuant to this section shall include any identifiable writing containing information relating to the conduct of the auxiliary organization that is prepared, owned, used, or retained by an auxiliary organization. Any reasonably segregable portion of a record shall be promptly available for inspection and copying after redacting those portions exempt from disclosure by law.

(b) Upon a request for a copy of a record that reasonably describes an
 identifiable record, an auxiliary organization shall make the record promptly available within a reasonable time to any person upon payment of fees covering only the direct cost of duplication, except with respect to records maintained by an auxiliary organization exempt from disclosure by law. Nothing in this article shall be construed to permit an auxiliary organization to delay or obstruct the inspection or copying of public records.

(c) If a member of the public requests to inspect a public record or obtain a copy of a record held by an auxiliary organization, the organization shall assist the person to make a focused and effective request that reasonably describes an identifiable record or records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89914.5.

(a) Upon a written request for a copy or inspection of records, an auxiliary organization shall determine, within 10 calendar days from the receipt of the request, whether the request, in whole or in part, seeks copies of disclosable records maintained by the auxiliary organization and shall notify the requester in writing without undue delay of the determination and the reasons therefor.

(b) (1) In unusual circumstances, the time limit prescribed in this section may be extended by a written notice by the head of the auxiliary organization, or his or her designee, to the person making the request that sets forth the reasons for the extension and the date on which a determination
 is expected to be sent. That notice shall not specify a date that would result in an extension of more than 14 days. When the auxiliary organization sends the determination, and if the auxiliary organization determines that the request seeks disclosable public records, the auxiliary organization shall state the estimated date and time when the records will be made available.

(2) As used in this section, “unusual circumstances” means the following, but only to the extent reasonably necessary to the proper processing of the particular request:

(A) The need to search for and collect the requested records from field facilities or other establishments that are separate from the office processing the request.

(B) The need to search for, collect, and appropriately examine a voluminous amount of separate and distinct records
 that are demanded in a single request.

(C) The need for consultation, which shall be conducted with all practicable speed, with another agency having a substantial interest in the determination of the request or among two or more components of the agency having a substantial subject matter interest therein.

(D) The need to compile data, to write programming language or a computer program, or to construct a computer report to extract data.

(c) An auxiliary organization shall justify withholding a record by demonstrating that the record is exempt from disclosure by law, or that, on the facts of the particular request, the public interest served by not disclosing the record clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the record.

(d) A
 response to a written request for inspection or copies of public records that includes a determination that the request is denied, in whole or in part, shall be in writing and shall set forth the names and titles or positions of each person responsible for the denial.

(e) This article shall not limit access to a public record on the basis of the purpose for which the record is being requested, if the record is otherwise subject to disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89915.

(a) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, an auxiliary organization that has information that constitutes an identifiable record not exempt from disclosure pursuant to this chapter that is in an electronic format shall make that record available in an electronic format when requested by any person and, when applicable, shall comply with both of the following:

(1) An auxiliary organization shall make an electronic record available in the electronic format in which it holds the information.

(2) An auxiliary organization shall provide a copy of an electronic record in the format requested if the requested format is one that has been used by
 the auxiliary organization to create copies for its own use or for provision to other entities or persons. The cost of duplication shall be limited to the direct cost of producing a copy of a record in an electronic format.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), the requester shall bear the cost of producing a copy of the record, including the cost to construct a record, and the cost of programming and computer services necessary to produce a copy of the record if either of the following applies:

(1) In order to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a), an auxiliary organization would be required to produce a copy of an electronic record and the record is one that is produced only at otherwise regularly scheduled intervals.

(2) The request would require data compilation, extraction, or programming
 to produce the record.

(c) If a request is for a record in a nonelectronic format, and the record is also available in an electronic format, an auxiliary organization may inform the requester that the record is available in an electronic format.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following:

(1) Require an auxiliary organization to reconstruct a record in an electronic format if the auxiliary organization no longer has the record available in an electronic format.

(2) Permit an auxiliary organization to make a record available only in an electronic format.

(3) Require an auxiliary organization to release an electronic record in the electronic form in which it is
 held by the auxiliary organization if its release would jeopardize or compromise the security or integrity of the original record, or of any proprietary software with which it is maintained.

(4) Permit public access to records held by an auxiliary organization to which access is otherwise restricted by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89915.5.

Nothing in this article shall require an auxiliary organization to disclose information that is exempt from disclosure pursuant to an exemption set forth in Section 7922.000 of the Government Code or in any provision listed in Section 7920.505 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 84.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

89916.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the following records maintained by an auxiliary organization shall not be subject to disclosure:

(1) Information that would disclose the identity of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(2) Personal financial information, estate planning information, and gift planning information of a donor, prospective donor, or volunteer.

(3) Personal information related to a donor’s private trusts or a donor’s private annuities administered by an auxiliary organization.

(4) Information related to fundraising plans, fundraising research, and solicitation strategies to the extent that these activities are not already protected under Section 99040, Title 5 (commencing with Section 3426) of Part 1 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, Section 1060 of the Evidence Code, or Section 7927.705 of the Government Code.

(5) The identity of students and alumni to the extent that this information is already protected under state and federal statutes applicable to the California State University. This paragraph shall not apply to a part-time or full-time employee of the auxiliary organization, or to a student who participates in a legislative body of a student body organization as defined in Section 89305.1.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to
 exempt from disclosure records that contain information regarding any of the following:

(1) The amount and date of a donation.

(2) Any donor-designated use or purpose of a donation.

(3) Any other donor-imposed restrictions on the use of a donation.

(4) (A) The identity of a donor who, in any fiscal year, makes a gift or gifts, in a quid pro quo arrangement, where either the value of the benefit received is in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or the benefit would be impermissible under state or federal law. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the gift or gifts maintained by an auxiliary organization
 that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(B) Annually, on January 1, the monetary threshold set forth in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted upward or downward to reflect the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, rounded off to the nearest one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(5) Self-dealing transactions, including, but not limited to, loans of money or property, or material financial interests of or between auxiliary officers or directors and an auxiliary organization, as set forth in Sections 5233 and 5236 of the Corporations Code. In these circumstances, records pertaining to the self-dealing transactions maintained by an auxiliary organization that would otherwise be exempt
 from disclosure under subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(6) Any instance in which a volunteer or donor of a gift is awarded, within five years of the date of the service or gift, a contract from the university or auxiliary organization that was not subject to competitive bidding. In these circumstances, records
 pertaining to the service or gift maintained by an auxiliary organization that would otherwise be exempt from disclosure under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 85.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

89916.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, trade secrets, as defined in Section 3426.1 of the Civil Code, shall not be subject to disclosure. This information shall be redacted from auxiliary organization records before disclosure.

(b) For purposes of this section, “trade secrets” means information, including a formula, pattern, compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that does both of the following:

(1) Derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to the public or to other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use.

(2) Is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to maintain its secrecy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89917.

Any person may institute proceedings for injunctive or declarative relief or writ of mandate in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce his or her right to inspect or to receive a copy of any record or class of records maintained by an auxiliary organization under this article. The times for responsive pleadings and for hearings in these proceedings shall be set by the judge of the court with the object of securing a decision as to these matters at the earliest possible time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89917.5.

(a) Whenever it is made to appear by verified petition to the superior court of the county where the records or some part thereof are situated that certain records maintained by an auxiliary organization are being improperly withheld from a member of the public, the court shall order the officer or person charged with withholding the records to disclose the record or show cause why he or she should not do so. The court shall decide the case after examining the record in camera, if permitted by subdivision (b) of Section 915 of the Evidence Code, papers filed by the parties, and any oral argument and additional evidence as the court may allow.

(b) If the court finds that an auxiliary organization
 official’s decision to refuse disclosure is not justified under this article, he or she shall order the official to make the record public. If the judge determines that the official was justified in refusing to make the record public, he or she shall return the item to the official without disclosing its content with an order supporting the decision refusing disclosure.

(c) An order of the court, either directing disclosure by an auxiliary organization or supporting the decision of the auxiliary organization official refusing disclosure, is not a final judgment or order within the meaning of Section 904.1 of the Code of Civil Procedure from which an appeal may be taken, but shall be immediately reviewable by petition to the appellate court for the issuance of an extraordinary writ. Upon entry of any order pursuant to this section, a party shall, in order to obtain review of the order, file a petition within 20 days after service upon him or her
 of a written notice of entry of the order, or within such further time not exceeding an additional 20 days as the trial court may for good cause allow. If the notice is served by mail, the period within which to file the petition shall be increased by five days. A stay of an order or judgment shall not be granted unless the petitioning party demonstrates it will otherwise sustain irreparable damage and probable success on the merits. Any person who fails to obey the order of the court shall be cited to show cause why he or she is not in contempt of court.

(d) The court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the plaintiff should the plaintiff prevail in litigation filed pursuant to this section. The costs and reasonable attorney’s fees shall be paid by the auxiliary organization of which the official is a member or employee and shall not become a personal liability of the auxiliary organization official. If the court finds
 that the plaintiff’s case is clearly frivolous, the court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the auxiliary organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89918.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided for in subdivision (c), whenever an auxiliary organization discloses a record it maintains that is otherwise exempt from this article, this disclosure shall constitute a waiver of the exemptions specified in this article.

(b) For purposes of this section, “auxiliary organization” includes a member, agent, volunteer, or officer of the auxiliary organization acting within the scope of his or her affiliation with the organization.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to the following disclosures:

(1) Disclosures made to a donor or prospective donor with regard to that
 donor’s donation or prospective donation to an auxiliary organization.

(2) Disclosures made to a volunteer or prospective volunteer with respect to that volunteer’s services being provided to the auxiliary organization.

(3) Disclosures made through other legal proceedings or as otherwise required by law.

(4) Disclosures within the scope of a disclosure required by law that limits disclosure of specified writings to certain purposes.

(5) Disclosures described in subdivision (a) of Section 89916 to an auditor conducting an audit.

(6) Disclosures described in subdivision (a) of Section 89916 to a bank or similar financial institution in the course of ordinary financial transactions, or in
 response to a request from the bank or other financial institution relating to the ordinary delivery of financial services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 43.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

89918.5.

Any provision in a contract entered into after the effective date of this article between an auxiliary organization and another party that would prevent the disclosure of information required to be disclosed pursuant to this article is void and unenforceable, and such a provision shall not justify a failure to comply with the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 247, Sec. 2.   (SB 8)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89919.

This article shall not apply to any records subject to a request made pursuant to the California Public Records Act, as set forth in Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 86.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings, Elections, and Judicial Determinations [89920. - 89928.]

89920.

Each governing board, or any subboard of the governing board, of an auxiliary organization shall conduct its business in public meetings. All governing board and subboard meetings shall be open and public, and all persons shall be permitted to attend any meeting of the governing board or subboard of an auxiliary organization, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89921.

Each governing board and subboard shall annually establish, by resolution, bylaws, or whatever other rule is required for the conduct of business by that body, the time and locations for holding regular meetings. Each governing board and subboard shall, at least one week prior to the date set for the meeting, give written notice of every regular meeting, and any special meeting which is called, at least one week prior to the date set for the meeting, to any individual or medium that has filed a written request for notice. Any request for notice filed pursuant to this section shall be valid for one year from the date on which it is filed unless a renewal request is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89922.

A special meeting may be called at any time by the presiding officer of a governing board or subboard, or by a majority of the members of the governing board or subboard, by delivering personally or by mail written notice to each member of the board or subboard, and to any medium or other party to be directly affected by a meeting, or any other person who has requested notice in writing. The call and notice of a special meeting shall be delivered at least 24 hours prior to any meeting and shall specify the time and place of the special meeting and the business to be transacted. No other business shall be considered at these meetings by the governing board or subboard. Written notice may be dispensed with as to any member who, at or prior to the time the meeting convenes, files with the clerk or the secretary of the governing board or subboard a written waiver of notice. The waiver may be given by telegram. Written notice may also be dispensed with as to any member who is actually present at the meeting at the time it convenes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89923.

Any governing board or subboard may hold closed sessions to consider matters relating to litigation, collective bargaining, or the appointment, employment, evaluation of performance, or dismissal of an employee, or to hear complaints or charges brought against an employee by another person or employee, unless the employee requests a public hearing. For the purposes of this section, “employee” does not include any person elected or appointed to an office. A board or subboard, upon a favorable majority vote of its members, may also hold a closed session to discuss investments where a public discussion could have a negative impact on the auxiliary organization’s financial situation. In this case, a final decision shall only be made during public sessions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89924.

No governing board or subboard shall take action on any issue until that issue has been publicly posted for at least one week.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89925.

Each auxiliary organization shall establish, by constitution, statute, bylaws, or resolution, provisions for elections of officers and board members. These provisions shall be designed to allow all those eligible to vote complete access to all information on issues and candidates. These provisions shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for sample ballots, numbers of days and hours for voting, polling locations, and notice of elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89926.

Where the constitution or articles of incorporation of an associated students auxiliary organization provides for a judiciary or judicial council with powers separate from the governing board of the auxiliary organization, decisions rendered by the judiciary or judicial council shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89927.

Each member of a governing board pursuant to this article who attends a meeting of the governing board where action is taken in violation of any provision of this article, with knowledge of the fact that the meeting is in violation of this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1158, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89928.

This article is not applicable to either of the following:

(a) Any entity formed or operating pursuant to Section 89300.

(b) The governing board of any statewide student organization that represents the students of the California State University.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Housing and Auxiliary Services [90000. - 90089.]



  ARTICLE 1. Housing [90000. - 90002.]

90000.

Student housing facilities may be established and maintained at any state university for the accommodation of students of the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 285, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

90001.

The trustees may require unmarried minor students of the state university, not living with a parent or guardian, to reside in private homes or other dwellings approved by the university, or to occupy student housing facilities provided at the university by the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 285, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

90001.5.

(a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at campuses of the California State University have stable housing, each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities shall give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the California State University that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, shall first give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to current and former homeless youth and
 current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for housing that is open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.

(b) In addition, each campus of the California State University is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.

(c) As used in this section, a “homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of his or her application for admission by a
 campus of the California State University, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:

(1) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The director, or his or her designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.

(3) A financial aid administrator.

(d) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (c) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the date of
 admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 571, Sec. 3.   (AB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

90002.

All student housing and any other related facilities operated by the College Auxiliary Enterprise Fund are hereby designated a “project” under the State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 and subject to the provisions of that act. All assets, liabilities, and fund balances of the College Auxiliary Enterprise Fund are hereby transferred from that fund to a separate account to be established by the trustees within the California State University Dormitory Revenue Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947 [90010. - 90083.]

90010.

This article may be cited as “The State University Revenue Bond Act of 1947.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

90011.

(a) The following terms wherever used or referred to in this article, or in any indenture entered into pursuant to this article, shall have the following meanings, respectively, unless a different meaning appears from the context:

(1) “Board” means the Trustees of the California State University.

(2) “Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means the written evidence of any obligation, other than revenue bond anticipation notes, issued by the board, payment of which is secured by a pledge of revenues or any part of revenues, as provided in this article, in order to obtain funds with which to carry out the purposes of this article, irrespective of the form of the obligations.

(3) The “holder of bonds” or “bondholder” or any similar term means any person who shall be the bearer of any outstanding revenue bond or bond registered to bearer or not registered or the registered owner of any outstanding revenue bond or bond that shall at the time be registered other than to the bearer.

(4) “Indenture” means an agreement entered into by the board pursuant to which revenue bonds are issued, regardless of whether the agreement is expressed in the form of a resolution of the board or by other instrument.

(5) “Notes” and “revenue bond anticipation notes” mean the written evidence of any obligation, including commercial paper notes, issued by the board, pursuant to Section 90013, in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds, for the purpose of obtaining funds to carry out the purposes of this article.

(6) “Person” includes any individual, firm, corporation, association, copartnership, trust, business trust, receiver, trustee, or conservator for any thereof, but does not include this state or any public corporation, political subdivision, city, county, district, or any agency thereof or of this state.

(7) “Project” means any one or more dormitories or other housing facilities, boarding facilities, student union or activity facilities, vehicle parking facilities, alternative transportation programs, or any other auxiliary or supplementary facilities for individual or group accommodation, owned or operated or authorized to be acquired, constructed, furnished, equipped, and operated by the board for use by students, faculty members, or other employees of any one or more campuses of the California State University, or a combination of those facilities, which may include facilities already completed and facilities authorized for future completion, or any other facilities designated by the board as a project in providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or notes.

(8) “Revenues” mean and include any and all fees, rates, rentals, and other charges received or receivable in connection with, and any and all other incomes and receipts of whatever kind and character derived by, the board from the operation of, or arising from, a project, including any revenue that may have been, or may be, impounded or deposited in any fund in the State Treasury created by this article or in any other fund or account pursuant to law for the security of any notes or bonds issued hereunder, or for the purpose of providing for the payment thereof, or the interest thereon.

(9) “State university” and “campus of the California State University” means any of the institutions included within the California State University, as listed in Section 89001.

(b) As used in this article:

(1) The present tense includes the past and future tenses, and the future tense includes the present tense.

(2) The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(3) The singular number includes the plural, and the plural includes the singular.

(4) “Shall” is mandatory, and “may” is permissive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90012.

The board, for the purposes of this article, has power and is hereby authorized, in addition to and amplification of all other powers conferred upon the board by the Constitution of the State of California or by any statute of the State of California:

(a) To acquire, subject to the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, and to hold and use, any real or personal property necessary, convenient, or useful for the carrying on of any of its powers pursuant to this article.

(b) To construct, operate, and control any project.

(c) To fix rates, rents, or other charges for the use of any project acquired, constructed, equipped, furnished, operated or maintained by the board, or for services rendered in connection therewith, and to alter, change, or modify the same at its pleasure, subject to any contractual obligation that may be entered into by the board with respect to the fixing of rates, rents, or charges.

(d) To enter into covenants to increase rates or charges from time to time as may be necessary pursuant to any contract or agreement with the holders of any bonds of the board.

(e) At any time and from time to time, to issue revenue bonds in order to raise funds for the purpose of establishing any project or of acquiring lands for any project, or of acquiring, constructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, financing, or refinancing any project, including payment of principal and interest on revenue bond anticipation notes, or for any combination of these purposes, which bonds may be secured as provided in this article.

(f) At any time, and from time to time, in connection with the financing or refinancing of any project, to loan or advance proceeds of revenue bonds or revenue bond anticipation notes to any person or state or local governmental entity, and to enter into loan agreements, leases, installation purchase agreements, conditional sales contracts, and similar financing instruments with the recipient of that loan or advance, all upon terms and conditions determined by the board.

(g) At any time and from time to time, to issue revenue bond anticipation notes pursuant to Section 90013.

(h) To adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary to enable the board to exercise the powers and to perform the duties conferred or imposed upon the board by this article.

(i) Nothing contained in this section or elsewhere in this article shall be construed directly or by implication to be in derogation of or in limitation of powers conferred upon or existing in the board by the Constitution or statutes of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90013.

(a) The board may issue revenue bond anticipation notes, in anticipation of the sale of revenue bonds. Before issuing any of these notes, the board shall, by resolution, authorize their issuance, declare the purpose for which the proceeds of the notes shall be expended, and specify the maximum amount of notes to be issued for that purpose.

(b) Revenue bond anticipation notes shall bear interest at the fixed or variable rate or rates determined by the board, not exceeding 12 percent per annum, payable in the time, form, and manner set forth in the indenture for the notes, and shall mature on the date or dates determined by the board and set forth in the resolution or indenture authorizing their issuance.

(c) The proceeds from the sale of notes shall be used only for the purposes for which the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be used in anticipation whereof the notes are issued.

(d) All notes issued, including renewal notes, and the interest thereon shall be payable from the proceeds of the sale of the bonds, the revenues of the project, any appropriations made for that purpose or all of these sources, and not otherwise, except that if the sale of the bonds has not occurred prior to the maturity of the notes issued in anticipation thereof, the board may issue renewal notes to pay the notes then maturing. No renewal notes shall be issued after the sale of the bonds in anticipation of which the original note was issued.

(e) Revenue bond anticipation notes may be secured by a pledge of, and lien upon, the proceeds of the sale of bonds, the revenues of the project, and any other legally available funds.

(f) A resolution or indenture authorizing the issuance of revenue bond anticipation notes may include provisions deemed necessary or advisable by the board for the security of the notes issued thereunder, and may include any and all provisions authorized to be included in indentures by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90014.

Notes authorized to be issued under this article shall be sold by the Treasurer, for cash, in the manner that the Treasurer shall be directed by a resolution requesting the sale adopted by the board. Notes in the form of commercial paper notes shall be sold in the manner specified in the indenture for the notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 352, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90015.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of any revenue bonds or revenue bond anticipation notes by the board is not dependent on nor affected in any way by:

(a) Proceedings taken by the board for the acquisition, construction or completion of any project or any part thereof.

(b) Any contracts made by the board in connection with the acquisition, construction or completion of any project.

(c) The failure to complete any project for which bonds or notes are authorized to be issued.
